Massachusetts, session 194th, H826.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 5 of Chapter 268B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after paragraph (10) of subsection (g) the 
following subsection:- 
(h) Every candidate for public office shall include within their statement of financial 
interest financial public assistance received, excluding MASSHealth and Medicaid.  
SECTION 2. Section 5 of Chapter 268B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking lines 117 to 118 in its entirety.